Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-1513
Bond.

The petitioner shall file with the Clerk of the Legislature, within five calendar days after filing the petition pursuant to section 50-1511, a bond with security approved by the Clerk of the Legislature conditioned to pay all costs incurred by the Legislature if the election is confirmed or the qualifications of the respondent member are confirmed. The bond shall be in an amount of at least ten thousand dollars as determined by the Clerk of the Legislature. If the Clerk of the Legislature determines that the bond is inadequate, he or she may order an increase in the amount of the bond at any stage of the proceedings.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 20.